Louisiana, session 2026, SB491.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:81 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§81. Official journal of state
A. The printing of advertisements, public notices, proclamations, and all
public notices and advertising to be done by the legislature, or the executive or other
departments and institutions of the state government, shall be published in a daily
newspaper or on a website established and maintained by the commissioner of
administration to be known and designated as the "Official Journal of the State".
Any newspaper shall meet the qualifications of R.S. 43:140(3) or R.S. 43:142(2)
through (4) and be selected by competitive bid at the publication rates set in
R.S. 43:147.1., which newspaper Newspapers shall have and possess the following
qualifications:
(1) It shall possess the periodicals class mailing privilege.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1505 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 491
(2) It shall be published in and have a general circulation in Louisiana.
(3) It shall have been so published at least once per week for a period of not
less than two years prior to the time that it is awarded the contract as the Official
Journal of the State, as provided in this Chapter.
* * *
§147.1. Compensation for printing; per character
A. The parish and municipal governing authorities and school boards of this
state may shall have their official proceedings and public notices published by
contract, compensation for which shall not exceed the amounts provided by this
Section unless agreed to by both parties in writing. Payment may be made monthly
or quarterly at the option of the governing authority or school board.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 43:81 as amended by Acts 2025, No. 374, is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§81. Official journal of state
A. Advertisements, public notices, proclamations, and all public notices and
advertising to be done by the legislature, or the executive or other departments and
institutions of the state government, shall be published in a newspaper or on a
website established and maintained by the commissioner of administration to be
known and designated as the "Official Journal of the State". Any newspaper shall
meet the qualifications of R.S. 43:140(3) or R.S. 43:142(2) through (4) and be
selected by competitive bid at the publication rates set in R.S. 43:147.1. Except
public notices required by the Constitution of Louisiana, the legislature may publish
any advertisements, public notices, or proclamations on the legislature's website.
* * *
Section 3. The provisions of Section 2 shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1505 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 491